North Dakota statutes. TITLE 49 Public Utilities
CHAPTER 49-21 Telecommunications Companies
49-21-13.1.
Telephone cooperatives — Sale of physical plant — Approval.

No mutual aid cooperative or cooperative association that is a telecommunications company as defined in section 49-21-01 may sell, transfer, or convey, within the period of any single calendar year, physical plant in excess of five percent in value of the cooperative, based upon the most recent audit of the books of the cooperative, unless consent has been obtained by vote of not less than two-thirds of the entire membership of the cooperative cast at any regular or special meeting called for that purpose, after notice in writing to all the membership of the cooperative not less than twenty nor more than thirty days prior to the date of such meeting. Nothing in this section prohibits the transfer of assets in exchange for physical plant of equal monetary value to any public or private person or organization.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 503, § 1.

49-21-14.
Connections with other telephone systems permitted. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 399, § 9.

49-21-15.
Physical connections. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 399, § 9.

49-21-16.
Forfeiture for failure to comply with order. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 515, § 26.

49-21-17.
Additional definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 399, § 9.

49-21-18.
Party line — Refusal to surrender — Emergency. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 399, § 9.

49-21-19.
Distributors of telephone directories to print notice therein. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 403, § 10.

49-21-20.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 399, § 9.

49-21-21.
Fraudulent telecommunications — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

49-21-22.
Regulatory reform review commission — Appointments — Compensation — Report to legislative council. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 600, § 17.

49-21-22.1.
Regulatory reform review commission — Appointments — Compensation — Report to legislative council. [Repealed]

Expired under S.L. 1995, ch. 453, § 2.

49-21-22.2.
Regulatory reform review commission — Appointments — Compensation — Report to legislative council. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 482, § 99.

49-21-23.
Construction of facilities — Cost recovery.

A telecommunications company is not required to construct, modify, or extend telecommunications facilities at the request or for the use of another telecommunications company except as required by the federal act.

The commission must allow a telecommunications company to recover in advance from the benefited company or customer any nonrecurring costs incurred at the request of another telecommunications company, a particular customer, or to comply with a commission order, including any order issued under section 49-21-10.2, for construction, modification or extension of the company’s network in excess of the normal course of business and primarily for the benefit of another telecommunications company or for a particular customer, and not due to any negligence or misconduct on the part of the company. This subsection does not apply to:

Costs incurred to extend or modify a network to provide for interconnection, collocation, network access, or the sale of unbundled network elements, unless those costs are identifiable and specific to a particular end-user customer, or wholesale services to another telecommunications company under the federal act;

Costs incurred to remedy discriminatory or unequal treatment that has been found to exist by the commission or an arbitrator; or

Costs for which some other recovery treatment is specifically provided in federal or state law.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 411, § 10; 2003, ch. 403, § 9.

49-21-24.
Prohibited acts — Arbitration.

A telecommunications company may not:

Discriminate against another provider of telecommunications services by refusing or delaying access to the company’s services;

Discriminate against another provider of telecommunications services by refusing or delaying access to essential facilities on terms and conditions no less favorable than those the telecommunications company provides to itself and its affiliates. A local telecommunications facility, feature, function, or capability of the telecommunications company’s network is an essential facility if all of the following apply:

Competitors cannot practically or economically duplicate the facility, feature, function, or capability or obtain the facility, feature, function, or capability from another source.

The use of the facility, feature, function, or capability by potential competitors is technically and economically feasible.

Denial of the use of the facility, feature, function, or capability by competitors is unreasonable.

The facility, feature, function, or capability will enable competition; or

Degrade the quality of access or service provided to another provider of telecommunications services.

A claim that a telecommunications company has violated this section may be resolved by arbitration or by a complaint filed with the commission. Arbitration of a claim must be conducted by a single arbitrator engaged in the practice of law under the rules of the American arbitration association. All expedited procedures prescribed by the American arbitration association rules apply. The arbitrator’s award is final and binding and may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof. A complaint filed with the commission must be referred to the office of administrative hearings for hearing and issuance of recommended findings of fact, conclusions of law, and an order pursuant to chapter 28-32. Each party shall bear its own costs and attorney’s fees and shall equally share in the fees and expenses of the arbitration or administrative hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 411, § 11.

49-21-25.
Competitive local exchange companies.

All competitive local exchange companies are subject to the requirements of this chapter regarding purchase of essential telecommunications services, section 49-21-01.4; access code number usage, section 49-21-01.5; call identification services, section 49-21-01.6; cross-subsidization, section 49-21-02.2; unauthorized telecommunications service, section 49-21-02.4; price schedules, sections 49-21-04 and 49-21-05; price complaints, section 49-21-06; discrimination, section 49-21-07; dialing parity, section 49-21-08.1; connections, sections 49-21-09 and 49-21-10; refunds, section 49-21-10.1; and quality of service, section 49-21-10.2.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 411, § 12; 2005, ch. 400, § 2.

49-21-26.
Fees.

Unless the governing body of a political subdivision has submitted to the qualified electors of that political subdivision the question of whether to impose a fee other than a fee for management costs and a majority of the voters approved the fee, a political subdivision may not impose after December 31, 1998, any fee to recover from a telecommunications company for the use of its right of way, other than a fee for its management costs. If requested by a political subdivision, in order to accomplish a necessary public improvement on the right of way, a telecommunications company promptly shall remove its facilities from the public right of way or shall relocate or adjust its facilities within the public right of way at no cost to the political subdivision. Necessary public improvements are limited to construction and maintenance activities directly related to improved transportation and safety. A political subdivision may recover from a telecommunications company only those management costs caused by the telecommunications company activity in the public right of way. A fee or other obligation under this section must be imposed on a competitively neutral basis. When a political subdivision’s management costs cannot be attributed to only one entity, those costs must be allocated among all users of the public rights of way, including the political subdivision itself. The allocation must reflect proportionately the costs incurred by the political subdivision as a result of the various types of uses of the public right of way. This section does not prohibit the collection of a franchise fee as permitted in section 49-21-29.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 410, § 2.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 1999, and section 8 of chapter 410, S.L. 1999, provides that it apply retroactively to January 1, 1999.

49-21-27.
In-kind services.

A political subdivision, in lieu of a fee imposed under section 49-21-26, may not require in-kind services by a telecommunications company right-of-way user or require in-kind services as a condition of the use of the political subdivision’s public right of way.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 410, § 3.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 1999, and section 8 of chapter 410, S.L. 1999, provides that it apply retroactively to January 1, 1999.

49-21-28.
Arbitration.

A telecommunications company that is denied the use of or access to a political subdivision right of way, that has its right-of-way permit revoked, or that believes that the fees imposed on that company by the political subdivision do not conform to the requirements of section 49-21-26 may request in writing that the denial, revocation, or fee imposition be reviewed by the governing body of the political subdivision. The governing body of the political subdivision shall act within thirty days of the request. A decision by the governing body affirming the denial, revocation, or fee imposition must be in writing and supported by written findings establishing the reasonableness of the decision.

Upon affirmation by the governing body of the denial, revocation, or fee imposition, the telecommunications company may do either of the following:

With the consent of the governing body, submit the matter to final, binding arbitration. Binding arbitration must be before an arbitrator selected by the political subdivision and the telecommunications company. If the parties are unable to agree on an arbitrator, the matter must be resolved by the three-person arbitration panel made up of one arbitrator selected by the political subdivision, one arbitrator selected by the telecommunications company, and one arbitrator selected by the other two arbitrators. The cost of a single arbitrator must be paid equally by the political subdivision and the telecommunications company. If a three-person arbitration panel is selected, each party shall pay the cost of its own arbitrator, and the parties shall jointly pay the cost of the third arbitrator and of the arbitration. Each party to the arbitration shall pay its own costs, disbursements, and attorney’s fees.

Bring an action in district court to review a decision of the governing body made under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 410, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 1999, and section 8 of chapter 410, S.L. 1999, provides that it apply retroactively to January 1, 1999.

49-21-29.
Franchise ordinance not superseded.

Sections 49-21-26, 49-21-27, and 49-21-28 do not modify or supersede the rights and obligations of a political subdivision and the telecommunications company established by the terms of any existing franchise. A city that collects a city franchise fee under a franchise may not collect a fee from that entity under section 49-21-26. A political subdivision that collects a fee prohibited by section 49-21-26 on January 1, 1999, may continue to collect that fee.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 410, § 5.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 1999, and section 8 of chapter 410, S.L. 1999, provides that it apply retroactively to January 1, 1999.

49-21-30.
Cost recovery.

A telecommunications company that is assessed either management costs by a political subdivision pursuant to section 49-21-26 or a city franchise fee pursuant to section 49-21-29 is entitled to recover those costs. If the telecommunications company serves customers within the boundaries of the political subdivision imposing the management costs, the costs may be recovered only from those customers.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 410, § 6.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 1999, and section 8 of chapter 410, S.L. 1999, provides that it apply retroactively to January 1, 1999.

49-21-31.
Performance assurance fund — Continuing appropriation.

The performance assurance fund is a special fund in the state treasury. The commission shall deposit payments received by the commission under the performance assurance plan in the performance assurance fund until the balance of the fund equals one hundred thousand dollars. Up to one hundred thousand dollars per biennium of moneys in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the commission to monitor the operation and effect of the performance assurance plan. All the payments received by the commission in excess of the one hundred thousand dollars balance in the performance assurance fund must be deposited in the general fund.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 406, § 1; 2005, ch. 402, § 1; 2007, ch. 63, § 3.